District of Columbia statutes.
7-1305.06

Prohibited psychological therapies.

No psychosurgery, convulsive therapy, experimental treatment or behavior modifications program involving aversive stimuli or deprivation of rights set forth in this subchapter shall be administered to any resident.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 506, 25 DCR 5094

History

1981 Ed., § 6-1966.
1973 Ed., § 6-1686.

Prior Codifications